Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.560

Data on college credit through dual credit courses—Posting on website.

In addition to data on student enrollment in dual credit courses, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall collect and post on the Washington state report card website the rates at which students earn college credit through a dual credit course, using the following criteria:

(1) Students who achieve a score of three or higher on an AP examination;

(2) Students who achieve a score of four or higher on an examination of the international baccalaureate diploma programme;

(3) Students who successfully complete a Cambridge advanced international certificate of education examination;

(4) Students who successfully complete a course through the college in the high school program under RCW 28A.600.287 and are awarded credit by the partnering institution of higher education;

(5) Students who satisfy the dual enrollment and class performance requirements to earn college credit through a career and technical education course; and

(6) Students who successfully complete a course through the running start program under RCW 28A.600.300 and are awarded credit by the institution of higher education.

[ 2022 c 75 s 3; 2021 c 71 s 3; 2013 c 184 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—2013 c 184: See note following RCW 28A.320.195.